Missouri, session 2026, HB3393.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 573.010 and 573.550, RSMo, are repealed and seven new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 407.3007, 407.3475, 537.039,
537.043, 573.010, 573.550, and 573.570, to read as follows:
407.3007. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI":
(a) Any artificial system that performs tasks under varying and unpredictable
circumstances without significant human oversight or that can learn from experience
and improve performance when exposed to data sets;
(b) An artificial system developed in computer software, physical hardware, or
other computer systems that solves tasks requiring human-like perception, cognition,
planning, learning, communication, or physical action;
(c) An artificial system designed to think or act like a human, including cognitive
architectures and neural networks;
(d) A set of techniques, including machine learning, that is designed to
approximate a cognitive task; or
(e) An artificial system designed to act rationally, including an intelligent
software agent or embodied robot that achieves goals using perception, planning,
reasoning, learning, communicating, decision-making, and acting;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 2
(2) "Mental health professional", the same as defined in section 632.005. The
term "mental health professional" shall also include any person licensed in a profession
regulated under chapter 337.
2. Any person or entity that develops or deploys artificial intelligence in the state
shall not advertise or represent to the public that the AI is or is able to act as a mental
health professional or is capable of providing therapy services, psychotherapy services,
or a mental health diagnosis.
3. Any violation of this section shall be considered an unlawful practice under
the Missouri merchandising practices act under this chapter.
4. The attorney general shall enforce the provisions of this section. Any
individual may report violations of this section to the attorney general. If the attorney
general finds that a violation occurred, the attorney general shall commence a civil
action in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that a violation occurred,
the court may grant damages, civil penalties, injunctive relief, attorney's fees, and any
such other relief the court finds appropriate. Notwithstanding section 407.100 to the
contrary, civil penalties shall be as follows:
(1) Ten thousand dollars for the first violation; or
(2) Twenty thousand dollars for any subsequent violation.
407.3475. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be referred
to as the "Megan Meier Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Account holder", a natural person who creates, maintains, or accesses an
account on a social media platform;
(2) "Age verification", a commercially reasonable method of confirming the age
of an account applicant consistent with industry standards and privacy protections;
(3) "Minor", a person under eighteen years of age;
(4) "Social media platform", an online service that allows users to create
accounts, create or view user-generated content, interact socially, and use
algorithmically curated feeds. The term "social media platform" does not include:
(a) Services primarily used for email, direct messaging, or business
collaboration;
(b) Educational platforms used by schools;
(c) Online video gaming services with integrated chat where social interaction is
incidental; and
(d) Internet service providers;
(5) "Verified parent or guardian", a person with legal custody of a minor,
verified through the procedures required under this section.

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 3
3. No social media platform shall permit a person under sixteen years of age to
create or maintain an account separate from a parent or guardian.
4. A minor sixteen years of age or older may hold an account only with the
verified consent of a parent or legal guardian.
5. Social media platforms may allow account creation but shall provide parents
or guardians the ability to:
(1) Access and review account activity;
(2) Request deletion of the minor's account; and
(3) Limit messaging features between the minor and unverified adult accounts.
6. A social media platform shall implement a secure age-verification process for
all Missouri users prior to account creation.
7. Age-verification data shall not be retained by the social media platform
beyond what is strictly necessary for compliance with the provisions of this section.
8. Social media platforms shall use age-verification techniques that:
(1) Protect user privacy; and
(2) Are independently certifiable as compliant with standards for data
minimization and security.
9. A social media platform shall immediately terminate any account determined
to belong to a person under sixteen years of age.
10. A verified parent or guardian may request deletion of a minor's account and
the social media platform shall comply within ten business days of such request. Social
media platforms shall provide a simple, accessible process for parents or guardians to
make such requests.
11. A social media platform shall not:
(1) Use addictive or manipulative design features specifically targeting minors,
including infinite-scroll mechanisms or auto-playing content without time-limit
controls;
(2) Permit direct messaging from adults to minors unless the adult is a verified
contact who is verified by a parent or guardian; or
(3) Serve any paid advertising, sponsored content, or commercial promotion to
any minor under sixteen years of age who holds an account under this section.
537.039. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Artificial intelligence", an engineered or machine-based system that varies
in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the
input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual
environments;

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 4
(2) "Explicit sexual material", any pictorial or three-dimensional material
depicting human masturbation, deviant sexual intercourse, sexual intercourse, direct
physical stimulation or unclothed genitals, sadomasochistic abuse, or emphasizing the
depiction of postpubertal human genitals. The term "explicit sexual material" shall not
include works of art or of anthropological significance.
2. No person or entity shall:
(1) Replicate or alter through the use of artificial intelligence an image or voice
of an individual to generate explicit sexual material; or
(2) Use the likeness of an individual through the use of artificial intelligence for
explicit sexual material

unless the person or entity has the individual's express written consent.
3. Any individual injured by a person or entity for a violation of subsection 2 of
this section may bring a cause of action against the person or entity to recover actual
damages as a result of the violation. Such individual shall also be entitled to recover
attorney's fees and costs.
537.043. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Consent", a freely given agreement to the disclosure of an intimate digital
depiction as provided by subsection 4 of this section. Assent does not constitute consent
if:
(a) It is given by a depicted individual who lacks the mental capacity to authorize
the disclosure of an intimate digital depiction and such mental incapacity is manifest or
known to a person who discloses the intimate digital depiction;
(b) It is given by a depicted individual who by reason of youth, mental disease or
defect, intoxication, a drug-induced state, or any other reason is manifestly unable, or
known by the person who discloses an intimate digital depiction to be unable, to make a
reasonable judgment as to the nature or harmfulness of the disclosure of an intimate
digital depiction; or
(c) It is induced by force, duress, or deception;
(2) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a result of digitization or by
means of digital manipulation, appears in whole or in part in a digital depiction and who
is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face, likeness, or other distinguishing
characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature, or from
information displayed in connection with the digital depiction;
(3) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation;

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 5
(4) "Information content providers", any person or entity that is responsible, in
whole or in part, for the creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;
(5) "Interactive computer service", any information service, system, or access
software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a
computer server, including specifically a service or system that provides access to the
internet and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational
institutions;
(6) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple of
the individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of the individual; or
b. From the body of the individual; or
(c) The individual engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
(7) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or
oral-anal, whether between individuals of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any individual.
2. Except as provided in subsection 8 or 11 of this section, a depicted individual
who is under eighteen years of age and is the subject of a digital depiction or a depicted
individual who is the subject of an intimate digital depiction that is disclosed without the
consent of the depicted individual where such disclosure was made by a person who
knows, or recklessly disregards, that the depicted individual has not consented to such
disclosure may bring a civil action against that other person in an appropriate circuit
court for relief as set forth in subsections 5 and 6 of this section.
3. In the case of a depicted individual who is under eighteen years of age or is
incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, the legal guardian of the depicted individual or
representative of the depicted individual's estate, another family member, or any person
appointed as suitable by the court may assume the depicted individual's rights under
this section, but in no event shall a defendant be named as such representative or
guardian of the depicted individual.

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 6
4. For the purposes of an action brought pursuant to subsection 2 or 3 of this
section:
(1) A depicted individual's consent to the creation of the digital depiction shall
not establish that the depicted individual consented to the disclosure of the digital
depiction;
(2) Consent of disclosure of an intimate digital depiction shall be deemed validly
given only if:
(a) It is set forth in an agreement written in plain language, signed knowingly
and voluntarily by the depicted individual; and
(b) The written agreement includes a general description of the intimate digital
depiction and, if applicable, the audiovisual work into which the intimate digital
depiction will be incorporated.
5. In a civil action brought pursuant to this section, a depicted individual may
recover any of the following:
(1) An amount equal to the monetary gain made by the defendant from the
creation, development, or disclosure of the digital depiction;
(2) Either of the following:
(a) The actual damages sustained by the depicted individual as a result of the
digital depiction, including damages for emotional distress; or
(b) Liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(3) Punitive damages; and
(4) The cost of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
6. In a civil action brought pursuant to this section, the court may, in addition to
any other relief available at law, order equitable relief, including a temporary
restraining order, a preliminary injunction, or a permanent injunction ordering the
defendant to cease the display or disclosure of the digital depiction.
7. In ordering relief pursuant to this section, the court may grant injunctive
relief maintaining the confidentiality of a plaintiff by using a pseudonym.
8. A depicted individual shall not bring an action for relief under this section if:
(1) The disclosure was made in good faith:
(a) To or by a law enforcement officer or agency in the course of reporting or
investigating unlawful conduct; or
(b) As part of a legal proceeding;
(2) The disclosure was a matter of legitimate public concern or public interest,
except that the disclosure shall not be considered a matter of legitimate public interest
or public concern solely because the depicted individual is a public figure; or
(3) The disclosure reasonably intended to assist the depicted individual.

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 7
9. A court may authorize an in camera proceeding under this section.
10. It shall not be a defense to an action under this section that there is a
disclaimer stating that the digital depiction was unauthorized or that the depicted
individual did not participate in the creation or development of the digital depiction.
11. A provider of an interactive computer service shall not be held liable in an
action brought pursuant to this section for:
100 (1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to restrict access to or availability
101 of digital depictions; or
102 (2) Any action taken to enable or make available to information content
103 providers or other persons the technical means to restrict access to digital depictions.
104 12. A civil action may be brought against a parent or legal guardian who
105 discloses an intimate digital depiction of his or her child. As used in this subsection, the
106 term "child" means a person under eighteen years of age.
573.010. As used in this chapter the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, juice bar, restaurant, bottle club, or other
commercial establishment, regardless of whether alcoholic beverages are served, which
regularly features persons who appear semi-nude;
(2) "Artificially generated visual depiction", includes depictions that are obscene
and indistinguishable from a real minor, morphed from a real minor's image, or
generated without any actual minor involvement;
(3) "Characterized by", describing the essential character or dominant theme of an
item;
[(3)] (4) "Child", any person under the age of fourteen;
[(4)] (5) "Child pornography":
(a) Any obscene material or performance depicting sexual conduct, sexual contact as
defined in section 566.010, or a sexual performance and which has as one of its participants or
portrays as an observer of such conduct, contact, or performance a minor; or
(b) Any visual depiction or artificially generated visual depiction, including any
photograph, film, video, picture, or computer or computer-generated image or picture,
whether made or produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means, of sexually explicit
conduct where:
a. The production of such visual depiction or artificially generated visual depiction
involves the use of a minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
b. Such visual depiction or artificially generated visual depictionis a digital image,
computer image, or computer-generated image that is, or is indistinguishable from, that of a
minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct, in that the depiction is such that an ordinary

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 8
person viewing the depiction would conclude that the depiction is of an actual minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct; or
c. Such visual depiction or artificially generated visual depiction has been created,
adapted, or modified to show that an identifiable minor is engaging in sexually explicit
conduct. "Identifiable minor" means a person who was a minor at the time the visual
depiction or artificially generated visual depiction was created, adapted, or modified; or
whose image as a minor was used in creating, adapting, or modifying the visual depiction or
artificially generated visual depiction; and who is recognizable as an actual person by the
person's face, likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or
other recognizable feature. The term identifiable minor shall not be construed to require
proof of the actual identity of the identifiable minor;
[(5)] (6) "Employ", "employee", or "employment", any person who performs any
service on the premises of a sexually oriented business, on a full-time, part-time, or contract
basis, whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent contractor, agent,
or otherwise. Employee does not include a person exclusively on the premises for repair or
maintenance of the premises or for the delivery of goods to the premises;
[(6)] (7) "Explicit sexual material", any pictorial or three-dimensional material
depicting human masturbation, deviate sexual intercourse, sexual intercourse, direct physical
stimulation or unclothed genitals, sadomasochistic abuse, or emphasizing the depiction of
postpubertal human genitals; provided, however, that works of art or of anthropological
significance shall not be deemed to be within the foregoing definition;
[(7)] (8) "Furnish", to issue, sell, give, provide, lend, mail, deliver, transfer, circulate,
disseminate, present, exhibit or otherwise provide;
[(8)] (9) "Material", anything printed or written, or any picture, drawing, photograph,
motion picture film, videotape or videotape production, or pictorial representation, or any
artificially generated visual depiction, or any recording or transcription, or any mechanical,
chemical, or electrical reproduction, or stored computer data, or anything which is or may be
used as a means of communication. Material includes undeveloped photographs, molds,
printing plates, stored computer data and other latent representational objects;
[(9)] (10) "Minor", any person less than eighteen years of age;
[(10)] (11) "Nudity" or "state of nudity", the showing of the human genitals, pubic
area, vulva, anus, anal cleft, or the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any
part of the nipple or areola;
[(11)] (12) "Obscene", any material or performance if, taken as a whole:
(a) Applying contemporary community standards, its predominant appeal is to
prurient interest in sex; and

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 9
(b) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find the
material depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way; and
(c) A reasonable person would find the material lacks serious literary, artistic,
political or scientific value;
[(12)] (13) "Operator", any person on the premises of a sexually oriented business
who causes the business to function, puts or keeps the business in operation, or is authorized
to manage the business or exercise overall operational control of the business premises. A
person may be found to be operating or causing to be operated a sexually oriented business
whether or not such person is an owner, part owner, or licensee of the business;
[(13)] (14) "Performance", any play, motion picture film, videotape, dance or
exhibition performed before an audience of one or more;
[(14)] (15) "Pornographic for minors", any material or performance if the following
apply:
(a) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find
that the material or performance, taken as a whole, has a tendency to cater or appeal to a
prurient interest of minors; and
(b) The material or performance depicts or describes nudity, sexual conduct, the
condition of human genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal, or
sadomasochistic abuse in a way which is patently offensive to the average person applying
contemporary adult community standards with respect to what is suitable for minors; and
(c) The material or performance, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic,
political, or scientific value for minors;
[(15)] (16) "Premises", the real property upon which a sexually oriented business is
located, and all appurtenances thereto and buildings thereon, including but not limited to the
sexually oriented business, the grounds, private walkways, and parking lots or parking
garages or both;
[(16)] (17) "Promote", to manufacture, issue, sell, provide, mail, deliver, transfer,
transmute, publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, or advertise, or to offer
or agree to do the same, by any means including a computer;
[(17)] (18) "Regularly", the consistent and repeated doing of the act so described;
[(18)] (19) "Sadomasochistic abuse", flagellation or torture by or upon a person as an
act of sexual stimulation or gratification;
[(19)] (20) "Semi-nude" or "state of semi-nudity", the showing of the female breast
below a horizontal line across the top of the areola and extending across the width of the
breast at such point, or the showing of the male or female buttocks. Such definition includes
the lower portion of the human female breast, but shall not include any portion of the

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 10
cleavage of the female breasts exhibited by a bikini, dress, blouse, shirt, leotard, or similar
wearing apparel provided the areola is not exposed in whole or in part;
[(20)] (21) "Sexual conduct", actual or simulated, normal or perverted acts of human
masturbation; deviate sexual intercourse; sexual intercourse; or physical contact with a
100 person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or the breast of a female in an act
101 of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification or any sadomasochistic abuse or acts including
102 animals or any latent objects in an act of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification;
103 [(21)] (22) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
104 (a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-
105 anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
106 (b) Bestiality;
107 (c) Masturbation;
108 (d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
109 (e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person;
110 [(22)] (23) "Sexually oriented business" includes:
111 (a) An adult bookstore or adult video store. "Adult bookstore" or "adult video store"
112 means a commercial establishment which, as one of its principal business activities, offers for
113 sale or rental for any form of consideration any one or more of the following: books,
114 magazines, periodicals, or other printed matter, or photographs, films, motion pictures, video
115 cassettes, compact discs, digital video discs, slides, or other visual representations which are
116 characterized by their emphasis upon the display of specified sexual activities or specified
117 anatomical areas. A principal business activity exists where the commercial establishment:
118 a. Has a substantial portion of its displayed merchandise which consists of such
119 items; or
120 b. Has a substantial portion of the wholesale value of its displayed merchandise
121 which consists of such items; or
122 c. Has a substantial portion of the retail value of its displayed merchandise which
123 consists of such items; or
124 d. Derives a substantial portion of its revenues from the sale or rental, for any form of
125 consideration, of such items; or
126 e. Maintains a substantial section of its interior business space for the sale or rental of
127 such items; or
128 f. Maintains an adult arcade. "Adult arcade" means any place to which the public is
129 permitted or invited wherein coin-operated or slug-operated or electronically, electrically, or
130 mechanically controlled still or motion picture machines, projectors, or other image-
131 producing devices are regularly maintained to show images to five or fewer persons per

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 11
132 machine at any one time, and where the images so displayed are characterized by their
133 emphasis upon matter exhibiting specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas;
134 (b) An adult cabaret;
135 (c) An adult motion picture theater. "Adult motion picture theater" means a
136 commercial establishment where films, motion pictures, video cassettes, slides, or similar
137 photographic reproductions, which are characterized by their emphasis upon the display of
138 specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas are regularly shown to more than five
139 persons for any form of consideration;
140 (d) A semi-nude model studio. "Semi-nude model studio" means a place where
141 persons regularly appear in a state of semi-nudity for money or any form of consideration in
142 order to be observed, sketched, drawn, painted, sculptured, photographed, or similarly
143 depicted by other persons. Such definition shall not apply to any place where persons
144 appearing in a state of semi-nudity do so in a modeling class operated:
145 a. By a college, junior college, or university supported entirely or partly by taxation;
146 b. By a private college or university which maintains and operates educational
147 programs in which credits are transferable to a college, junior college, or university supported
148 entirely or partly by taxation; or
149 c. In a structure:
150 (i) Which has no sign visible from the exterior of the structure and no other
151 advertising that indicates a semi-nude person is available for viewing; and
152 (ii) Where, in order to participate in a class, a student must enroll at least three days in
153 advance of the class;
154 (e) A sexual encounter center. "Sexual encounter center" means a business or
155 commercial enterprise that, as one of its principal purposes, purports to offer for any form of
156 consideration physical contact in the form of wrestling or tumbling between two or more
157 persons when one or more of the persons is semi-nude;
158 [(23)] (24) "Sexual performance", any performance, or part thereof, which includes
159 sexual conduct by a child who is less than eighteen years of age;
160 [(24)] (25) "Specified anatomical areas" include:
161 (a) Less than completely and opaquely covered: human genitals, pubic region,
162 buttock, and female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola; and
163 (b) Human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely and
164 opaquely covered;
165 [(25)] (26) "Specified sexual activity", includes any of the following:
166 (a) Intercourse, oral copulation, masturbation, or sodomy; or
167 (b) Excretory functions as a part of or in connection with any of the activities
168 described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision;

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 12
169 [(26)] (27) "Substantial", at least thirty percent of the item or items so modified;
170 [(27)] (28) "Visual depiction", includes undeveloped film and videotape, and data
171 stored on computer disk or by electronic means which is capable of conversion into a visual
172 image.
573.550. 1. A person commits the offense of providing explicit sexual material to a
student if such person is affiliated with a public or private elementary or secondary school in
an official capacity and, knowing of its content and character, such person provides, assigns,
supplies, distributes, loans, or coerces acceptance of or the approval of the providing of
explicit sexual material to a student or possesses with the purpose of providing, assigning,
supplying, distributing, loaning, or coercing acceptance of or the approval of the providing of
explicit sexual material to a student.
2. The offense of providing explicit sexual material to a student is a class A
misdemeanor.
3. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Explicit sexual material", any pictorial, three-dimensional, or visual depiction or
artificially generated visual depiction, including any photography, film, video, picture, or
computer-generated image, showing human masturbation, deviate sexual intercourse as
defined in section 566.010, sexual intercourse, direct physical stimulation of genitals,
sadomasochistic abuse, or emphasizing the depiction of postpubertal human genitals;
provided, however, that works of art, when taken as a whole, that have serious artistic
significance, or works of anthropological significance, or materials used in science courses,
including but not limited to materials used in biology, anatomy, physiology, and sexual
education classes shall not be deemed to be within the foregoing definition;
(2) "Person affiliated with a public or private elementary or secondary school in an
official capacity", an administrator, teacher, librarian, media center personnel, substitute
teacher, teacher's assistant, student teacher, law enforcement officer, school board member,
school bus driver, guidance counselor, coach, guest lecturer, guest speaker, or other nonschool
employee who is invited to present information to students by a teacher, administrator, or
other school employee. Such term shall not include a student enrolled in the elementary or
secondary school.
573.570. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a result of digitization or by
means of digital manipulation, appears in whole or in part in a digital depiction and who
is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face, likeness, or other distinguishing
characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature, or from
information displayed in connection with the digital depiction;

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 13
(2) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation;
(3) "Information content providers", any person or entity that is responsible, in
whole or in part, for the creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;
(4) "Interactive computer service", any information service, system, or access
software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a
computer server, including specifically a service or system that provides access to the
internet and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational
institutions;
(5) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple of
the individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of the individual; or
b. From the body of the individual; or
(c) The individual engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
(6) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or
oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any individual.
2. A person commits the offense of disclosure of a digital depiction if the person
discloses, or threatens to disclose:
(1) A digital depiction of a depicted individual; or
(2) An intimate digital depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm, or cause substantial harm
to the finances or reputation of the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that or reckless disregard for whether such
disclosure or threatened disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or
economic harm to the depicted individual.
3. (1) A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class E felony unless
the digital depiction is of a depicted individual who is under eighteen years of age in
which case it shall be a class D felony.

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 14
(2) A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class C felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent violation of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction could be reasonably expected
to:
a. Affect the conduct of any administrative, legislative, or judicial proceeding of
a federal, state, local, or tribal government agency, including the administration of an
election or the conduct of foreign relations; or
b. Facilitate violence.
4. It shall not be a defense to the offense of disclosure of a digital depiction as
provided by this section that there is a disclaimer stating that the digital depiction was
unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not participate in the creation or
development of the digital depiction.
5. (1) No later than December 31, 2026, an information content provider shall
establish a process whereby a depicted individual or an authorized person acting on
behalf of such individual may:
(a) Notify the information content provider of a published digital depiction or
intimate digital depiction that includes a depiction of the depicted individual and such
depiction was published without the consent of the depicted individual; and
(b) Submit a request for the information content provider to remove such digital
depiction or intimate digital depiction.
(2) A notification and request for removal of a digital depiction or intimate
digital depiction submitted under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall include, in
writing:
(a) A physical or electronic signature of the depicted individual or authorized
person;
(b) An identification of, and information reasonably sufficient for the
information content provider to locate, the digital depiction or intimate digital
depiction of the depicted individual;
(c) A brief statement that the depicted individual has a good faith belief that any
digital depiction or intimate digital depiction identified under paragraph (b) of this
subdivision is not consensual, including any relevant information for the information
content provider to determine the digital depiction or intimate digital depiction was
published without the consent of the depicted individual; and
(d) Information sufficient to enable the information content provider to contact
the depicted individual or authorized person.

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 15
(3) An information content provider shall provide on the platform a clear and
conspicuous notice, which may be provided through a clear and conspicuous link to
another web page or disclosure, of the notification and removal process established
under subdivision (1) of this subsection that:
(a) Is easy to read and in plain language; and
(b) Provides information regarding the responsibilities of the information
content provider under this subsection, including a description of how an individual can
submit a notification and request for removal.
(4) Upon receiving a valid removal request from a depicted individual or an
authorized person using the process described in subdivision (1) of this subsection, an
information content provider shall, as soon as practicable, but not later than forty-eight
hours after receiving such request:
(a) Remove the digital depiction or intimate digital depiction; and
(b) Make reasonable efforts to identify and remove any known identical copies
of such digital depiction or intimate digital depiction.
(5) An information content provider shall not be liable for any claim based on
the information content provider's good faith disabling of access to, or removal of,
material claimed to be a nonconsensual digital depiction or intimate digital depiction
based on facts or circumstances from which the unlawful publishing of a digital
depiction or intimate digital depiction is apparent, regardless of whether the digital
100 depiction or intimate digital depiction is ultimately determined to be unlawful.
101 (6) A failure to reasonably comply with the notice and removal obligations under
102 this subsection shall be treated as an unfair practice under section 407.020, and the
103 person or entity responsible shall be subject to the penalties provided in section 407.020.
104 (7) This subsection shall not apply to the following:
105 (a) An information service or a telecommunications service, as those terms are
106 defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153, providing services for content provided by another
107 person;
108 (b) Email;
109 (c) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this
110 section, an online service, application, or website:
111 a. That consists primarily of content that is not user generated but is preselected
112 by the provider of such online service, application, or website; and
113 b. For which any chat, comment, or interactive functionality is incidental to,
114 directly related to, or dependent on the provision of the content described in
115 subparagraph a. of this paragraph.

HCS HBs 3393 & 2392 16
116 6. The criminal penalties provided in subsection 3 of this section shall apply to
117 any parent or legal guardian who discloses an intimate digital depiction of his or her
118 child. As used in this subsection, the term "child" means a person under eighteen years
119 of age.
120 7. The criminal penalties provided in this section shall not apply to:
121 (1) A provider of an interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section
122 230(f)(2), of an information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153, or of a
123 communications service that provides the transmission, storage, or caching of electronic
124 communications or messages of others; another related telecommunications or
125 commercial mobile radio service; or content provided by another person;
126 (2) A law enforcement officer as defined in section 590.502, or any local, state,
127 federal, or military law enforcement agency engaged in the performance of his or her
128 duties as a law enforcement officer or the duties of the law enforcement agency;
129 (3) A person reporting unlawful activity; or
130 (4) A person participating in a hearing, trial, or other legal proceeding.
✔